Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Chapter 5. Hampton Roads Sanitation District.

§ 21-291.
Repealed by Acts 1960, c. 66.

§ 21-291.1.
Repealed by Acts 1987, c. 57.

§ 21-291.2.
Creation of District.

Chapter 66 of the Acts of 1960 as amended by Acts 1962, c. 584, Acts 1964, c. 520, Acts 1974, c. 112, Acts 1976, c. 637, Acts 1977, c. 271, Acts 1987, c. 30, Acts 1989, c. 350, Acts 1990, c. 153, Acts 1998, c. 210, Acts 2004, c. 120, Acts 2008, c. 574, Acts 2012, c. 724, Acts 2017, c. 218, and Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 428, relating to the creation of the Hampton Roads Sanitation District, is incorporated in this Code by this reference.